Georgia, session 2025_26, HR462.
BE IT ENACTED BY
52 THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF GEORGIA:'. No statute or section of the Official
53 Code of Georgia Annotated shall be amended or repealed by mere reference to its title or
54 to the number of the section of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, but the amending
55 or repealing Act shall distinctly describe the law to be amended or repealed as well as the
56 alteration to be made. A direct initiative or referendum petition proposing a statute or
57 amendment to a statute or the repeal of a statute or an amendment to a statute shall not refer
58 to more than one subject matter and shall not contain matter different from what is
59 expressed in the title thereof. A direct initiative or referendum petition shall also include
60 the wording of the ballot question that will be submitted to the voters for approval if such
61 petition is certified; provided, however, that such ballot questions shall be unambiguous
62 and understandable for the voters and subject to a yes or no vote.
63 (c) A direct initiative or referendum petition shall be filed with the Secretary of State not
64 less than 180 days before a general election in which members of the General Assembly
65 are to be elected. The Secretary of State shall immediately proceed to examine the filed
66 petition and compute and verify whether or not a sufficient number of signatures are
H. R. 462
- 3 -

25 LC 47 3197
67 captured. If the petition contains less than the required number of signatures, the Secretary
68 of State shall reject the petition; provided, however, that the General Assembly by law may
69 provide for a period to cure such deficiencies. If the petition appears to contain the
70 required number of signatures, the Secretary of State shall certify the petition, and shall put
71 the direct initiative or referendum on the ballot at the next general election at which
72 members of the General Assembly are to be elected, using the ballot question outlined in
73 the petition.
74 (d) If such ballot question is approved by at least 60 percent of the electors qualified to
75 vote for members of the General Assembly voting thereon in such general election, such
76 proposal shall become law and shall go into effect on the first day of July immediately
77 following such election, unless an earlier effective date is provided for in the direct
78 initiative or referendum and is clearly stated in the ballot question.
79 (e) If such ballot question is rejected by the electors voting in such general election, such
80 proposal shall not become law, and the same or a substantially similar proposal by direct
81 initiative or referendum shall not be authorized for a period of three years from the date of
82 such election.
83 Paragraph III. Provisions of statutory procedures. The General Assembly shall provide
84 by law for procedures to facilitate the operation of this section, and such procedures shall
85 include, but not be limited to, providing for the formatting, sponsorship, circulation, and
86 review of petitions, necessity for fiscal review of proposed statutory changes, and
87 procedures for appealing adverse decisions related thereto."
88 SECTION 3.
89 Article X, Section I of the Constitution is amended by revising Paragraphs I and II as
90 follows:
91 "Paragraph I. Proposals to amend the Constitution; new Constitution. Amendments to
92 this Constitution or a new Constitution may be proposed by the General Assembly, by
H. R. 462
- 4 -

25 LC 47 3197
93 direct initiative of the people, or by a constitutional convention, as provided in this article.
94 Only amendments which are of general and uniform applicability throughout the state shall
95 be proposed, passed, or submitted to the people.
96 Paragraph II. Proposals by the General Assembly; proposals by direct initiative of the
97 people; submission to the people. (a) A proposal by the General Assembly to amend this
98 Constitution or to provide for a new Constitution shall originate as a resolution in either the
99 Senate or the House of Representatives and, if approved by two-thirds of the members to
100 which each house is entitled in a roll-call vote entered on their respective journals, shall be
101 submitted to the electors of the entire state at the next general election which is held in the
102 even-numbered years. A summary of such proposal shall be prepared by the Attorney
103 General, the Legislative Counsel, and the Secretary of State and shall be published in the
104 official organ of each county and, if deemed advisable by the 'Constitutional Amendments
105 Publication Board,' in not more than 20 other newspapers in the state designated by such
106 board which meet the qualifications for being selected as the official organ of a county.
107 Said board shall be composed of the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, and the Speaker
108 of the House of Representatives. Such summary shall be published once each week for
109 three consecutive weeks immediately preceding the day of the general election at which
110 such proposal is to be submitted. The language to be used in submitting a proposed
111 amendment or a new Constitution shall be in such words as the General Assembly may
112 provide in the resolution, or, in the absence thereof, in such language as the Governor may
113 prescribe. A copy of the entire proposed amendment or of a new Constitution shall be filed
114 in the office of the judge of the probate court of each county and shall be available for
115 public inspection; and the summary of the proposal shall so indicate. The General
116 Assembly is hereby authorized to provide by law for additional matters relative to the
117 publication and distribution of proposed amendments and summaries not in conflict with
118 the provisions of this Paragraph.
H. R. 462
- 5 -

25 LC 47 3197
119 (b) If such proposal is ratified by a majority of the electors qualified to vote for members
120 of the General Assembly voting thereon in such general election, such proposal shall
121 become a part of this Constitution or shall become a new Constitution, as the case may be.
122 (c)(1) A proposal to amend this Constitution by direct initiative of the people shall be
123 put on the ballot if a number of registered electors equal to 10 percent or more of the total
124 number of electors who were registered and eligible to vote in Georgia for candidate for
125 the office of presidential elector in the last preceding presidential election in the state sign
126 a petition for direct initiative, thus certifying the petition. Petition signatures must be
127 collected within the boundaries of at least one-half of the state's congressional districts
128 for the petition to be certified.
129 (2) The language to be used in submitting a proposed amendment shall be in such
130 words as provided in the direct initiative process.
131 (3) Summaries and notice of such proposed amendments shall be prepared and
132 provided in the same manner provided for in subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph for
133 proposals by the General Assembly.
134 (4) If such proposal is ratified by a two-thirds' majority of the electors qualified to vote
135 for members of the General Assembly voting thereon in such general election, such
136 proposal shall become a part of this Constitution.
137 (5) If such proposal is rejected by the electors voting in such general election, such
138 proposal shall not become part of this Constitution, and the same or a substantially
139 similar amendment shall not be proposed by direct initiative for a period of three years
140 from the date of such election.
141 (6) The General Assembly shall provide by law for procedures to facilitate the
142 operation of this subsection, and such procedures shall include, but not be limited to,
143 providing for the formatting, sponsorship, circulation, and review of petitions, and
144 procedures for appealing adverse decisions related thereto.
H. R. 462
- 6 -

25 LC 47 3197
145 (d) Any proposal so approved shall take effect as provided in Paragraph VI of this article.
146 When more than one amendment is submitted at the same time, they shall be so submitted
147 as to enable the electors to vote on each amendment separately, provided that one or more
148 new articles or related changes in one or more articles may be submitted as a single
149 amendment."
150 SECTION 4.
151 The above proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be published and submitted as
152 provided in Article X, Section I, Paragraph II of the Constitution. The ballot submitting the
153 above proposed amendment shall have written or printed thereon the following:
154 "( ) YES Shall the Constitution of Georgia be amended so as to provide that the people
155 ( ) NO of the State of Georgia shall have a limited power through direct initiative and
156 referendum petition to enact, repeal, or amend statutes and to amend this
157 Constitution?"
158 All persons desiring to vote in favor of ratifying the proposed amendment shall vote "Yes."
159 All persons desiring to vote against ratifying the proposed amendment shall vote "No." If
160 such amendment shall be ratified as provided in said Paragraph of the Constitution, it shall
161 become a part of the Constitution of this state.
H. R. 462
- 7 -